District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.64

Foreign corporations — Admission to conduct affairs in District.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 290, Pub. L. 87-569, § 64
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.64.
1981 Ed., § 29-565.
1973 Ed., § 29-1064.